Arkansas, session 2025, HB1659.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-8-503(a), concerning property interest of
entitlement holder in financial asset held by securities intermediary, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) To the extent necessary for a securities intermediary to satisfy
all security entitlements with respect to a particular financial asset, all
interests in that financial asset held by the securities intermediary are
held by the securities intermediary for the entitlement holders, are not
property of the securities intermediary, and are not subject to claims of
creditors of the securities intermediary, except as otherwise provided in §
4-8-511.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-8-511 is amended to read as follows:
4-8-511. Priority among security interests and entitlement holders.
*ANS180*
03/04/2025 10:11:45 AM ANS180

HB1659
(a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c), if If
a securities intermediary does not have sufficient interests in a particular
financial asset to satisfy both its obligations to entitlement holders who
have security entitlements to that financial asset and its obligation to a
creditor of the securities intermediary who has a security interest in that
financial asset, the claims of entitlement holders, other than the creditor,
have priority over the claim of the creditor.
(2) A claim of or a cause of action of an entitlement holder
under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be litigated in this state.
(b) A claim of a creditor of a securities intermediary who has a
security interest in a financial asset held by a securities intermediary has
priority over claims of the securities intermediary's entitlement holders who
have security entitlements with respect to that financial asset if the
creditor has control over the financial asset On and after January 1, 2026, a
dispute, case, claim, or controversy resulting from a contract or agreement
entered into under subsection (a) of this section shall be resolved or
litigated in this state.
(c) If a clearing corporation does not have sufficient financial
assets to satisfy both its obligations to entitlement holders who have
security entitlements with respect to a financial asset and its obligation to
a creditor of the clearing corporation who has a security interest in that
financial asset, the claim of the creditor has priority over the claims of
entitlement holders.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 4-9-305(a), concerning the law governing
perfection and priority of security interests in investment property, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), the following
rules apply:
(1) While a security certificate is located in a jurisdiction,
the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of
perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in the
certificated security represented thereby.
(2) The local law of the issuer's jurisdiction as specified in §
4-8-110(d) governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and
the priority of a security interest in an uncertificated security.
03/04/2025 10:11:45 AM ANS180

HB1659
(3) The local law of the securities intermediary's jurisdiction
as specified in § 4-8-110(e) governs perfection, the effect of perfection or
nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a security
entitlement or securities account.
(4) The local law of the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction
governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the
priority of a security interest in a commodity contract or commodity account.





























03/04/2025 10:11:45 AM ANS180